Arkansas, session 2025, SB607.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-10-117 is amended to read as follows:
6-10-117. Four-day school week — Definition.
(a)(1) It is found and determined by the General Assembly that
granting local public school districts greater flexibility in scheduling
instructional time can reap educational benefits for the students and
financial rewards for the public school district.
(2) It is the intent of this section to authorize local public
school districts to initiate and maintain public school educational programs
on a four-day school-week basis, so long as if planned instructional time is
in accord with requirements established by meets the State Board of Education
*TNL397*
04/01/2025 5:34:34 PM TNL397

SB607
requirements promulgated under subsection (d) of this section.
(b) As used in this section, “four-day school week” means an
educational program in which all students attend school for four (4) days a
week but no fewer than the total number of hours required by the Standards
for Accreditation of Arkansas Public Schools and School Districts in a five-
day school week.
(c)(1) The board of directors of any a public school district is
authorized to may initiate and maintain a four-day school week in any or all
of the public schools in the public school district.
(2) The state board and the Department of Education shall not
have the authority to approve or deny the decision of a public school
district board of directors to initiate and maintain a four-day school week
in any or all of its public schools under subdivision (c)(1) of this section.
(d)(1) The State Board of Education state board shall establish
appropriate standards, guidelines, and rules for only the following:
(A)(i) The determination of average daily membership of
school districts and for the distribution of state aid to each local public
school district that elects to operate any or all of the public schools of
its school district on a four-day school-week basis, to provide the public
school district with an equitable share of state aid funds.
(ii) The state aid funds under subdivision
(d)(1)(A)(i) of this section that are designated to equate a four-day school-
week operation by the school district to ensure the educational opportunities
provided by a public school district offering a four-day school week are
equivalent to the educational opportunities provided by a public school
district offering a five-day school week or a public school that follows a
traditional calendar;
(B) The requirement that each public school district that
initiates and maintains a four-day school week for any or all of its public
schools under this section shall:
(i)(a) Average six (6) hours of instruction per
school day and thirty (30) hours of instruction per school week.
(b) The hourly requirements under subdivision
(d)(1)(B)(i)(a) of this section may be met with four (4) seven-and-one-half-
hour school instructional days.
(c) A public school district that initiates
04/01/2025 5:34:34 PM TNL397

SB607
and maintains a four-day school week in a public school that provides
instruction to students in grades nine through twelve (9-12) shall meet the
clock-hour equivalency of one hundred twenty (120) clock hours for a Carnegie
unit;
(ii)(a) Provide documentation to the Division of
Elementary and Secondary Education to determine the success of the
educational program.
(b) Assessment measures utilized by the
division under subdivision (d)(1)(B)(ii)(a) of this section shall include
without limitation state-approved criterion-referenced tests and other
assessment instruments required or approved by the division; and
(iii) Include the four-day school week on the agenda
for the public school district's required annual report to the public to
determine local support for and provide for continual community input into
the success and continuation of four-day school weeks; and
(C) The forfeiture of the ability to initiate and maintain
a four-day school week under this section if a public school district:
(i) Is classified by the state board as in need of
Level 5 — Intensive support; and
(ii) Demonstrates persistent underperformance, as
defined by state benchmarks, on the state-approved criterion-referenced test
and other assessment instruments required or approved by the division.
(2) Provided, however, that a A public school district shall not
receive any more state financial aid for offering a four-day school week of
instruction than it would have received for offering a five-day school week
of instruction.
(3) The state board and the department shall not promulgate
rules regarding public school districts that initiate and maintain a four-day
school week for any or all of its public schools that are in addition to the
requirements under this subsection (d).
(4) A public school district that initiates and maintains a
four-day school week for any or all of its public schools under this section
shall:
(A) Demonstrate compliance with the requirements under
subdivision (d)(1) of this section through a state-approved electronic
application; and
04/01/2025 5:34:34 PM TNL397

SB607
(B) Not be required to submit additional reports or
demonstrations of compliance with the requirements under subdivision (d)(1)
of this section to the state board or division.

SECTION 2. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that school districts must
determine and publish their school calendars in advance of the upcoming 2025-
2026 school year; that school districts must have their school calendars
established in order to prepare appropriate staffing, operational, and
financial needs; that parents, students, staff members, and others associated
with school districts must know in advance of the upcoming school year what
the school calendar will be in order to make necessary arrangements; and that
this act is immediately necessary to ensure school districts have the
required information to arrange for and provide constitutionally mandated
education to enrolled students. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist,
and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public
peace, health, and safety shall become effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.













04/01/2025 5:34:34 PM TNL397